District of Columbia statutes.
29-701.08

Partnership agreement; effect on limited partnership and person becoming partner; preformation agreement.

(a)

A limited partnership is bound by and may enforce the partnership agreement, whether or not the partnership has itself manifested assent to the partnership agreement.

(b)

A person that becomes a partner of a limited partnership is deemed to assent to the partnership agreement.

(c)

Two or more persons intending to become the initial partners of a limited partnership may make an agreement providing that upon the formation of the partnership the agreement will become the partnership agreement.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(2)(G), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-701.02.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Section 2(g)(2)(F) of D.C. Law 19-210 redesignated former § 20-701.08 as § 29-701.10.